Illinois, session 104th, HB4406.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 52-3.161 and by adding Sections 10-20.88 and 34-18.88 as 6follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.161)8    Sec. 2-3.161. Definition of dyslexia; reading instruction 9advisory group; handbook; screening rules. 10    (a) The State Board of Education shall incorporate, in 11both general education and special education, the following 12definition of dyslexia:13        Dyslexia is a specific learning disability that is 14    neurobiological in origin. Dyslexia is characterized by 15    difficulties with accurate and/or fluent word recognition 16    and by poor spelling and decoding abilities. These 17    difficulties typically result from a deficit in the 18    phonological component of language that is often 19    unexpected in relation to other cognitive abilities and 20    the provision of effective classroom instruction. 21    Secondary consequences may include problems in reading 22    comprehension and reduced reading experience that can 23    impede growth of vocabulary and background knowledge.  HB4406- 2 -LRB104 17032 LNS 30447 b1    (b) (Blank).2    (c) The State Board of Education shall develop and 3maintain a handbook to be made available on its Internet 4website that provides guidance for pupils, parents or 5guardians, and teachers on the subject of dyslexia. The 6handbook shall include, but is not limited to:7        (1) guidelines for teachers and parents or guardians 8    on how to identify signs of dyslexia;9        (2) a description of educational strategies that have 10    been shown to improve the academic performance of pupils 11    with dyslexia; and12        (3) a description of resources and services available 13    to pupils with dyslexia, parents or guardians of pupils 14    with dyslexia, and teachers; and .15        (4) guidelines on the administration of a universal 16    screener and Level I dyslexia screening, the 17    interpretation of data from the screener or screening, and 18    the resulting appropriate instruction within a 19    multi-tiered system of support (MTSS) framework. 20    The State Board shall review the handbook once every 4 21years to update, if necessary, the guidelines, educational 22strategies, or resources and services made available in the 23handbook. 24    (d) The State Board of Education shall adopt any rules 25necessary to ensure that a student is screened, as provided 26under Section 10-20.88 or 34-18.88, for the risk factors of   HB4406- 3 -LRB104 17032 LNS 30447 b1dyslexia using a universal screener: 2        (1) if a student is in any of grades kindergarten 3    through second in the public schools;4        (2) if a student in any of grades kindergarten through 5    second:6            (A) transfers to a new public school; and7            (B) has not been screened previously during the 8        school year; and 9        (3) if a student from another state enrolls for the 10    first time in any of grades kindergarten through second in 11    a school district in this State, unless the student 12    presents documentation that the student: 13            (A) had the dyslexia screening or a similar 14        screening during the school year; or15            (B) is exempt from screening. 16    (e) The State Board of Education shall adopt any rules 17necessary to ensure that (i) a student is screened, as 18provided under Section 10-20.88 or 34-18.88, for the 19characteristics of dyslexia using a Level I dyslexia screening 20and (ii) a student receives dyslexia intervention services 21under Section 10-20.88 or 34-18.88.22    (f) The State Board of Education shall provide technical 23assistance for specific learning disabilities to school 24districts, including assistance with universal screeners and 25Level I dyslexia screenings. 26(Source: P.A. 102-539, eff. 8-20-21.)   HB4406- 4 -LRB104 17032 LNS 30447 b1    (105 ILCS 5/10-20.88 new)2    Sec. 10-20.88. Dyslexia screening and support required.3    (a) In this Section:4    "Level I dyslexia screening" means a process, as 5determined by the school district, for gathering additional 6information to determine if the characteristics of dyslexia 7are present.8    "Universal screener" means an assessment used to aid 9educators in understanding the causes for student performance, 10learning strengths, and the needs that underlie student 11performance. The assessment is conducted to identify or 12predict students who may be at risk for poor learning outcomes 13and is typically brief and conducted with all students at a 14particular grade level.15    (b) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, each school 16district must screen students in grades kindergarten through 17second for the risk factors of dyslexia using a universal 18screener. The screening of students must include, as 19developmentally appropriate, all of the following:20        (1) Phonological and phonemic awareness.21        (2) Sound symbol recognition.22        (3) Alphabet knowledge.23        (4) Decoding skills.24        (5) Rapid naming skills. 25        (6) Encoding skills.  HB4406- 5 -LRB104 17032 LNS 30447 b1        (7) Oral reading fluency. 2    (c) If a student is determined to be at risk, or at some 3risk, for dyslexia after the universal screener has been 4administered under subsection (b), the school district must 5administer a Level I dyslexia screening of the student. 6Through the Level I dyslexia screening, the school district 7must gather additional information to determine if the student 8has the characteristics of dyslexia. The additional 9information may include, but is not limited to, information 10from progress monitoring data, work samples, additional age 11and grade-appropriate assessments related to dyslexia, teacher 12questionnaires, parent interviews, information regarding the 13student's family history related to dyslexia, and speech and 14language assessments.15    (d) If the universal screener or the Level I dyslexia 16screening indicates that a student has some risk factors for 17dyslexia or the characteristics of dyslexia, the school must 18use a multi-tiered system of support (MTSS) framework to 19address the needs of the student.20    (e) A school district is not required to administer a 21Level I dyslexia screening to a student if the student is 22receiving dyslexia intervention services. 23    (f) If a student's performance on a Level I dyslexia 24screening indicates a need for dyslexia intervention services, 25the school district must do both of the following: 26        (1) Notify the student's parent or guardian of the   HB4406- 6 -LRB104 17032 LNS 30447 b1    results of all screenings. 2        (2) Provide the student's parent or guardian with 3    information and resource material that includes all of the 4    following: 5            (A) The characteristics of dyslexia.6            (B) The appropriate classroom interventions and 7        accommodations for students with dyslexia.8            (C) A statement that the parent or guardian may 9        elect to have the student receive an educational 10        evaluation by the school. 11    (g) If the student's Level I dyslexia screening indicates 12that the student has characteristics of dyslexia, the dyslexia 13intervention services provided to the student must be 14implemented using diagnostic teaching guidelines described in 15the handbook developed under Section 2-3.161.16    (h) On or before July 1, 2027 and on or before each July 1 17thereafter, each school district must report all of the 18following information to the State Board of Education: 19        (1) The number of students who were administered a 20    universal screener during the school year.21        (2) The number of students who were determined to be 22    at risk, or at some risk, for dyslexia. 23        (3) The number of students during the previous school 24    year who received dyslexia intervention services under 25    this Section.26        (4) The total number of students identified with the   HB4406- 7 -LRB104 17032 LNS 30447 b1    characteristics of dyslexia during the school year. 2The State Board of Education shall publish the information 3collected from the reports submitted by school districts on 4its Internet website.  5    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.88 new)6    Sec. 34-18.88. Dyslexia screening and support required. 7    (a) In this Section:8    "Level I dyslexia screening" means a process, as 9determined by the school district, for gathering additional 10information to determine if the characteristics of dyslexia 11are present.12    "Universal screener" means an assessment used to aid 13educators in understanding the causes for student performance, 14learning strengths, and the needs that underlie student 15performance. The assessment is conducted to identify or 16predict students who may be at risk for poor learning outcomes 17and is typically brief and conducted with all students at a 18particular grade level.19    (b) Beginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the school 20district must screen students in grades kindergarten through 21second for the risk factors of dyslexia using a universal 22screener. The screening of students must include, as 23developmentally appropriate, all of the following:24        (1) Phonological and phonemic awareness.25        (2) Sound symbol recognition.  HB4406- 8 -LRB104 17032 LNS 30447 b1        (3) Alphabet knowledge.2        (4) Decoding skills.3        (5) Rapid naming skills. 4        (6) Encoding skills.5        (7) Oral reading fluency. 6    (c) If a student is determined to be at risk, or at some 7risk, for dyslexia after the universal screener has been 8administered under subsection (b), the school district must 9administer a Level I dyslexia screening of the student. 10Through the Level I dyslexia screening, the school district 11must gather additional information to determine if the student 12has the characteristics of dyslexia. The additional 13information may include, but is not limited to, information 14from progress monitoring data, work samples, additional age 15and grade-appropriate assessments related to dyslexia, teacher 16questionnaires, parent interviews, information regarding the 17student's family history related to dyslexia, and speech and 18language assessments.19    (d) If the universal screener or the Level I dyslexia 20screening indicates that a student has some risk factors for 21dyslexia or the characteristics of dyslexia, the school must 22use a multi-tiered system of support (MTSS) framework to 23address the needs of the student.24    (e) The school district is not required to administer a 25Level I dyslexia screening to a student if the student is 26receiving dyslexia intervention services.   HB4406- 9 -LRB104 17032 LNS 30447 b1    (f) If a student's performance on a Level I dyslexia 2screening indicates a need for dyslexia intervention services, 3the school district must do both of the following: 4        (1) Notify the student's parent or guardian of the 5    results of all screenings. 6        (2) Provide the student's parent or guardian with 7    information and resource material that includes all of the 8    following: 9            (A) The characteristics of dyslexia.10            (B) The appropriate classroom interventions and 11        accommodations for students with dyslexia.12            (C) A statement that the parent or guardian may 13        elect to have the student receive an educational 14        evaluation by the school. 15    (g) If the student's Level I dyslexia screening indicates 16that the student has characteristics of dyslexia, the dyslexia 17intervention services provided to the student must be 18implemented using diagnostic teaching guidelines described in 19the handbook developed under Section 2-3.161.20    (h) On or before July 1, 2027 and on or before each July 1 21thereafter, the school district must report all of the 22following information to the State Board of Education: 23        (1) The number of students who were administered a 24    universal screener during the school year.25        (2) The number of students who were determined to be 26    at risk, or at some risk, for dyslexia.   HB4406- 10 -LRB104 17032 LNS 30447 b1        (3) The number of students during the previous school 2    year who received dyslexia intervention services under 3    this Section.4        (4) The total number of students identified with the 5    characteristics of dyslexia during the school year. 6The State Board of Education shall publish the information 7collected from the report on its Internet website.  8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92026.